Utah statutes.
17C-1-504.   Contesting the legality of resolution authorizing bonds -- Time
limit -- Presumption.
(1)  Any person may contest the legality of the resolution authorizing
issuance of the bonds or any provisions for the security and payment of the
bonds for a period of 30 days after:
(a)  publication of the resolution authorizing the bonds; or
(b)  publication of a notice of bonds containing substantially the items
required under Subsection 11-14-316(2).
(2)  After the 30-day period under Subsection (1), no lawsuit or other
proceeding may be brought contesting the regularity, formality, or legality of
the bonds for any reason.
(3)  In a lawsuit or other proceeding involving the question of whether a bond
issued under this part is valid or enforceable or involving the security for a
bond, if a bond recites that the agency issued the bond in connection with an
urban renewal, economic development, or community development project:
(a)  the bond shall be conclusively presumed to have been issued for that
purpose; and
(b)  the project area plan and project area shall be conclusively presumed to
have been properly formed, adopted, planned, located, and carried out in
accordance with this title.
